docker/build/vendor/latexprinter/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-ka.tex
1ქი
2ქლ2
ქ1ლე
ქ1ლო
ქ1მ2
ქ1ნ2
1ქო
ქ1ჟ
ქ1რ2
ქ1ს2
ქ1ტ2
1ქუ
ქ1ქ
ქ1ღ
ქ1შ
ქ1ც2
1ღატ
2ღ1ბ2
ღ1გ
2ღ1დ2
2ღვ2
ღ1ვი
ღ1ვშ
2ღ1ზ
2ღ1თ2
ღ1კ2
2ღ1ლ2
2ღ1მ2
2ღ1ნ
2ღ1რ2
2ღ1ს2
ღ1ტ
ღ2ტყ
ღ1ფ
ღფრ2
ღ1ქ2
2ღ1შ
ღ1ძ2
2ღ1წ
ღ1ჭ
2ყ1ბ
2ყდ2
2ყ1ვ2
2ყ1ზ
2ყ1თ
2ყლ2
2ყ1მ2
2ყნ2
ყ1ნე
ყ1ნო
2ყრ2
ყ1რე
2ყს
2ყ1შ
1შა
შა3ხვ
შ1გ
2შ1დ
1შე
2შ1ვ2
შ1ზ
2შ1თ
1ში
შია3თ2
2შ1კ2
2შ1ლ2
2შ1მ
2შ1ნ
1შო
2შ1პ
2შ1რ
2შ1ს
2შ1ტ2
შ2ტერი
შ2ტერო
1შუ
შ2ფ
2შ1ქ2
2შ1შ
2შ1ჩ
2შ1ხ2
2შ1ჯ
2ჩ1ბ
2ჩ1დ
2ჩ1ვ2
2ჩ1ზ
2ჩ1თ
2ჩ1მ
2ჩ1ნ2
ჩო1
2ჩ1რ2
2ჩს
2ჩ1ქ2
2ჩ1შ
ჩხ2
2ც1ბ
2ც1დ
2ც1ვ2
2ც1ზ
2ც1თ2
2ც1კ
2ც1ლ
2ც1მ2
2ც1ნ
2ც1რ
2ც1ს
ც2ქ2
ც1ქდ
ც1ქნ
ც1ქრ
2ც1ღ
2ც1შ
ცხ2
ძარ4ცვს.
2ძ1გ2
2ძ1ვ2
2ძ1ზ
2ძთ
1ძი
2ძ1ლ2
2ძ1მ
2ძნ
ძ1ნე
2ძ1რ2
2ძს
1ძუ
1ძღ2
ძ2ჭ
წა3გლ
2წ1ბ
2წ1გ
2წ1ვ2
2წ1კ2
წ1ლი
წმ2
წ1მდ
წ1მე
წ1მო
წ1მყ
2წ1ნ
წრ2
წ1რთ
წყ2
1ჭა
2ჭ1დ
1ჭე
2ჭ1ვ2
1ჭი
ჭ1კ2
ჭ1ლო
2ჭ1მ2
2ჭ1ნ
1ჭო
2ჭ1რ
1ჭუ
ჭყ2
ხა2ლ1ახ
2ხ1ბ
ხგ2
2ხ1დ2
2ხვ2
ხ1ვე
ხ1ვი
ხ1ვრ
2ხზ2
2ხ1თ
2ხ1ლ2
ხმ2
2ხ1ნ
2ხ1პ
2ხრ2
2ხ1ს2
2ხ1ტ2
2ხ1ქ
2ხყ
2ხ1შ2
2ხ1ჩ
2ხ1ც
2ხ1წ
2ხ1ხ
2ხჰ2
2ჯგ2
2ჯ1დ
ჯვ2
2ჯ1თ
ჯო2რ1
ჯო3რი
ჯ2რ
ჯ1რა
2ჯ1ს
ჯ2შ
1ჰა
ჰ1გ2
1ჰე
1ჰი
ჰ1კ2
ჰ1მ
ჰ1პ
ჰ1რ
ჰ1ს
ჰ1ფ
ჰ1ქ
ჰ1ღ
ჰ1ყ2
ჰ1ხ2
}
